California statutes. Penal Code
(e) The number of days that release, discharge, or expiration of sentence is accelerated shall in no case exceed 10 percent of the particular inmate’s original sentence, prior to the application thereto of any other credits or benefits authorized by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 54.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4024.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the board of supervisors of any county may authorize the sheriff or other official in charge of county correctional facilities to offer a voluntary program under which any person committed to the facility may participate in a work release program pursuant to criteria described in subdivision (b), in which one day of participation will be in lieu of one day of confinement.

(b) The criteria for a work release program are the following:

(1) The work release program shall consist of any of the following:

(A) Manual labor to improve or maintain levees or public facilities, including,
 but not limited to, streets, parks, and schools.

(B) Manual labor in support of nonprofit organizations, as approved by the sheriff or other official in charge of the correctional facilities. As a condition of assigning participants of a work release program to perform manual labor in support of nonprofit organizations pursuant to this section, the board of supervisors shall obtain workers’ compensation insurance which shall be adequate to cover work-related injuries incurred by those participants, in accordance with Section 3363.5 of the Labor Code.

(C) Performance of graffiti cleanup for local governmental entities, including participation in a graffiti abatement program as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 594, as approved by the sheriff or other official in charge of the correctional facilities.

(D) Performance of weed and rubbish abatement on public and private property pursuant to Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 39501) of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 4 of the Government Code, or Part 5 (commencing with Section 14875) or Part 6 (commencing with Section 14930) of Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code, as approved by the sheriff or other official in charge of the correctional facilities.

(E) Performance of house repairs or yard services for senior citizens and the performance of repairs to senior centers through contact with local senior service organizations, as approved by the sheriff or other official in charge of the correctional facilities. Where a work release participant has been assigned to this task, the sheriff or other official shall agree upon in advance with the senior service organization about the type of services to be rendered by the participant and the extent of contact permitted between the
 recipients of these services and the participant.

(F) Any person who is not able to perform manual labor as specified in this paragraph because of a medical condition, physical disability, or age, may participate in a work release program involving any other type of public sector work that is designated and approved by the sheriff or other official in charge of county correctional facilities.

(2) The sheriff or other official may permit a participant in a work release program to receive work release credit for documented participation in educational programs, vocational programs, substance abuse programs, life skills programs, or parenting programs. Participation in these programs shall be considered in lieu of performing labor in a work release program, with eight work-related hours to equal one day of custody credit.

(3) The work release program shall be under the direction of a responsible person appointed by the sheriff or other official in charge.

(4) (A) The hours of labor to be performed pursuant to this section shall be uniform for all persons committed to a facility in a county and may be determined by the sheriff or other official in charge of county correctional facilities, and each day shall be a minimum of 8 and a maximum of 10 hours, in accordance with the normal working hours of county employees assigned to supervise the programs. However, reasonable accommodation may be made for participation in a program under paragraph (2).

(B) As used in this section, “nonprofit organizations” means organizations established or operated for the benefit of the public or in support of a significant public interest, as set forth in Section 501(c)(3) of the
 Internal Revenue Code. Organizations established or operated for the primary purpose of benefiting their own memberships are excluded.

(c) (1) The board of supervisors may prescribe reasonable rules and regulations under which a work release program is operated and may provide that participants wear clothing of a distinctive character while performing the work. As a condition of participating in a work release program, a person shall give their promise to appear for work or assigned activity by signing a notice to appear before the sheriff or at the education, vocational, or substance abuse program at a time and place specified in the notice and shall sign an agreement that the sheriff may immediately retake the person into custody to serve the balance of the person’s sentence if the person fails to appear for the program at the time and place agreed to, does not perform the work or activity assigned, or for any other
 reason is no longer a fit subject for release under this section. A copy of the notice shall be delivered to the person and a copy shall be retained by the sheriff. Any person who willfully violates their written promise to appear at the time and place specified in the notice is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) Whenever a peace officer has reasonable cause to believe the person has failed to appear at the time and place specified in the notice or fails to appear or work at the time and place agreed to or has failed to perform the work assigned, the peace officer may, without a warrant, retake the person into custody, or the court may issue an arrest warrant for the retaking of the person into custody, to complete the remainder of the original sentence. A peace officer may not retake a person into custody under this subdivision, without a warrant for arrest, unless the officer has a written order to do so, signed by the sheriff or other person in
 charge of the program, that describes with particularity the person to be retaken.

(d) (1) This section does not require the sheriff or other official in charge to assign a person to a program pursuant to this section if it appears from the record that the person has refused to satisfactorily perform as assigned or has not satisfactorily complied with the reasonable rules and regulations governing the assignment or any other order of the court.

(2) A person shall be eligible for work release under this section only if the sheriff or other official in charge concludes that the person is a fit subject therefor.

(e) This section shall become operative July 1, 2021.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 64) and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 92, Sec. 65.   (AB 1869)   Effective September 18, 2020.   Operative July 1, 2021, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4024.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the board of supervisors of any county in which the average daily inmate population is 90 percent of the county’s correctional system’s mandated capacity may authorize the sheriff or other official in charge of county correctional facilities to operate a program under which any person committed to the facility is required to participate in a work release program pursuant to criteria described in subdivision (b) of Section 4024.2. Participants in this work release program shall receive any sentence reduction credits that they would have received had they served their sentences in a county correctional facility. Priority for participation in the work release program shall be given to inmates who volunteer to participate in the program.

(b) For purposes of this section, all of the following definitions apply:

(1) “County correctional system’s mandated capacity” means the total capacity of all jails and other correctional facilities for the permanent housing of adult inmates within the county.

(2) “Mandated capacity” of any facility is the capacity for that facility as established by court order or the facility’s rated capacity as established by the Board of Corrections, whichever is less.

(3) “Average daily jail population” is the average total number of inmates incarcerated within the county jail system computed on an annual basis.

(c) (1) The board of supervisors may prescribe reasonable rules and regulations under which a work release program authorized under this section is operated and may provide that participants wear clothing of a distinctive character while performing the work. A person shall be advised by written notice to appear before the sheriff or at the educational, vocational, or substance abuse program at a time and place specified in the notice and shall sign an acknowledgement that the sheriff may immediately retake the person into custody to serve the balance of his or her sentence if the person fails to appear for the program at the time and place designated in the notice, does not perform the work or activity assigned, or for any other reason is no longer a fit subject for release under this section. A copy of the notice and acknowledgement shall be delivered to the person and a copy shall be retained by the sheriff.

(2) Any person who willfully fails to appear at the time and place specified in the notice is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(3) Whenever a peace officer has reasonable cause to believe the person has failed to appear at the time and place specified in the notice or fails to appear or work at the time and place agreed to or has failed to perform the work assigned, the peace officer may, without a warrant, retake the person into custody, or the court may issue an arrest warrant for the retaking of the person into custody, to complete the remainder of the original sentence. A peace officer may not retake a person into custody under this subdivision, without a warrant for arrest, unless the officer has a written order to do so, signed by the sheriff or other person in charge of the work release program, that describes with particularity the person to be retaken.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the sheriff or other official in charge to assign a person to a work release program pursuant to this section if it appears from the record that the person has refused to perform satisfactorily as assigned or has not satisfactorily complied with the reasonable rules and regulations governing the assignment or any other order of the court.

(e) A person shall be eligible for work release under this section only if the sheriff or other official in charge concludes that the person is a fit subject therefor.

(f) The board of supervisors may prescribe a program administrative fee, not to exceed the pro rata cost of administration, to be paid by each person according to his or her ability to pay.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 106, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4024.4.

(a) The board of supervisors of each county, with the concurrence of the county sheriff before implementation, and the city council of each city, with the concurrence of the chief of police before implementation, may establish a notification procedure to provide notice of the release of any person incarcerated at, or arrested and released on bail from, a local detention facility under its jurisdiction to victims of crime who have requested to be so notified. A county or city and two or more counties or cities jointly may contract with a private entity to implement this procedure.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the sheriff, chief of police, or other official in charge of a local detention facility shall make available to any private entity under contract pursuant to subdivision (a) all information necessary to implement the notification procedure in a timely manner. The private entity under contract shall be responsible for retrieving the information and notifying the requester through computer or telephonic means and, if unable to notify the person requesting the information by these means, shall send written notification by mail.

(c) The sheriff, chief of police, or other official in charge of a local detention facility shall work cooperatively with law enforcement agencies within the county or city and local victim centers established under Section 13835 to implement the program.

(d) As used in this section, “local detention facility” means a facility specified in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 6031.4.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no public or private officer, employee, or entity may be held liable for any action or duty undertaken pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1060, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4024.5.

(a) The rights established in this section apply to any person being released from a county jail, including, but not limited to, a person who has completed a sentence served, has been ordered by the court to be released, has been released on the person’s own recognizance, has been released because the charges have been dismissed by the court, is acquitted by a jury, is cited and released on a misdemeanor charge, has posted bail, has complied with pretrial release conditions, or has had the charges dropped by the prosecutor.

(b) (1) The sheriff shall make the release standards, release processes, and release schedules of the county jail
 available to a person following the determination to release that person.

(2) The release standards shall include the list of rights enumerated in this section and the timeframe for the expedient release of a person following the determination to release that person.

(c) A person incarcerated in, or recently released from, a county jail shall have access to up to three free telephone calls from a telephone in the county jail to plan for a safe and successful release.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 327, Sec. 1.   (AB 2023)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4025.

(a) The sheriff of each county may establish, maintain and operate a store in connection with the county jail and for this purpose may purchase confectionery, tobacco and tobacco users’ supplies, postage and writing materials, and toilet articles and supplies and sell these goods, articles, and supplies for cash to inmates in the jail. Commencing January 1, 2028, the store, if established by the sheriff in a county, shall sell sulfate-free shampoos and conditioners, curl creams, and gel.

(b) The sale prices of the articles offered for sale at the store shall be fixed by the sheriff. Any profit shall be deposited in an
 inmate welfare fund to be kept in the treasury of the county.

(c) There shall also be deposited in the inmate welfare fund 10 percent of all gross sales of inmate hobbycraft.

(d) There shall be deposited in the inmate welfare fund any money, refund, rebate, or commission received from a telephone company or pay telephone provider when the money, refund, rebate, or commission is attributable to the use of pay telephones which are primarily used by inmates while incarcerated.

(e) The money and property deposited in the inmate welfare fund shall be expended by the sheriff primarily for the benefit, education, and welfare of the inmates confined within the jail. Any funds that are not needed for the welfare of the inmates may be expended for the maintenance of county jail facilities. Maintenance of county jail facilities
 may include, but is not limited to, the salary and benefits of personnel used in the programs to benefit the inmates, including, but not limited to, education, drug and alcohol treatment, welfare, library, accounting, and other programs deemed appropriate by the sheriff. Inmate welfare funds shall not be used to pay required county expenses of confining inmates in a local detention system, such as meals, clothing, housing, or medical services or expenses, except that inmate welfare funds may be used to augment those required county expenses as determined by the sheriff to be in the best interests of inmates. An itemized report of these expenditures shall be submitted annually to the board of supervisors.

(f) The operation of a store within any other county adult detention facility
 that is not under the jurisdiction of the sheriff shall be governed by the provisions of this section, except that the board of supervisors shall designate the proper county official to exercise the duties otherwise allocated in this section to the sheriff.

(g) The operation of a store within any city adult detention facility shall be governed by the provisions of this section, except that city officials shall assume the respective duties otherwise outlined in this section for county officials.

(h) The treasurer may, pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 53600), or Article 2 (commencing with Section 53630) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, deposit, invest, or reinvest any part of the inmate welfare fund, in excess of that which the treasurer deems necessary for immediate use. The interest or increment accruing
 on these funds shall be deposited in the inmate welfare fund.

(i) The sheriff may expend money from the inmate welfare fund to provide indigent inmates, prior to release from the county jail or any other adult detention facility under the jurisdiction of the sheriff, with essential clothing and transportation expenses within the county or, at the discretion of the sheriff, transportation to the inmate’s county of residence, if the county is within the state or within 500 miles from the county of incarceration. This subdivision does not authorize expenditure of money from the inmate welfare fund for the transfer of any inmate to the custody of any other law enforcement official or jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 56, Sec. 3.   (AB 1875)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4025.5.

(a) There is hereby created a program in the Counties of Alameda, Kern, Los Angeles, Marin, Napa, Orange, Sacramento, San Bernardino, San Francisco, San Diego, San Luis Obispo, Santa Barbara, Santa Clara, Stanislaus, and Ventura. In each county, the sheriff or the county officer responsible for operating the jails may expend money from the inmate welfare fund to provide indigent inmates, after release from the county jail or any other adult detention facility under the jurisdiction of the sheriff or the county officer responsible for operating the jails, assistance with the reentry process within 30 days after the inmate’s release. The assistance provided may include work placement, counseling, obtaining proper identification,
 education, and housing.

(b) This section does not authorize money from the inmate welfare fund to be used to provide any services that are required to be provided by the sheriff or the county. Money in the fund shall supplement existing services, and shall not be used to supplant any existing funding for services provided by the sheriff or the county.

(c) As part of the itemized report of expenditures required to be submitted to the board of supervisors pursuant to Section 4025, any sheriff or county officer responsible for operating a jail of a county that participates in the program shall include in the report all of the following:

(1) How much money was spent pursuant to this section.

(2) The number of inmates the program served.

(3) The types of assistance for which the funds were used.

(4) The average length of time an inmate used the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 178, Sec. 1.   (AB 920)   Effective August 25, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4026.

The sheriff or other officer in charge of a county or city jail may provide for the manufacture of small articles of handiwork by prisoners out of raw materials purchased by the prisoners with their own funds or funds borrowed from the inmate welfare fund, which articles may be sold to the public at the county or city jails, in public buildings, at fairs, or on property operated by nonprofit associations. County- or city-owned property shall not be sold or given to prisoners for use under this section, except as expressly permitted by this section. The sheriff or other officer in charge shall comply with subdivision (c) of Section 4025 and provide that the balance of the sale price of the articles be deposited to the account of the prisoner manufacturing the article after repaying the inmate welfare fund any amount borrowed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 916.)
-------------------------------------------

4027.

(a) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that all prisoners confined in local detention facilities shall be afforded reasonable opportunities to exercise religious freedom.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that all prisoners confined in local detention facilities shall be afforded religious grooming, clothing, and headwear accommodations in accordance with Section 2607.

(b) As used in this section “local detention facility” means any city, county, or regional facility used for the confinement of prisoners for more than 24
 hours.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 388, Sec. 2.   (SB 309)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4027.5.

(a) On or before January 1, 2025, the sheriff of each county or the administrator of each local detention facility shall develop and implement a religious grooming, clothing, and headwear policy for individuals in the custody of a local detention facility, including, but not limited to, county jails and holding facilities. The policy shall meet the minimum requirements of Section 2607 and be in accordance with accepted best practices.

(b) For purposes of this section, “local detention facility” means any city, county, or regional facility used for the confinement of prisoners for more than 24 hours, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 4027.

(c) This section applies without regard to whether the facility is operated pursuant to a contract with a private contractor and without regard to whether the inmate has been charged with or convicted of a crime.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 388, Sec. 3.   (SB 309)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4028.

(a) A condition or restriction shall not be imposed upon the obtaining of an abortion by a person detained in any local detention facility, pursuant to Sections 1 and 1.1 of Article I of the California Constitution and the Reproductive Privacy Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 123460) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code), other than those contained in those provisions. Impermissible restrictions include, but are not limited to, imposing gestational limits inconsistent with state law, unreasonably delaying access to the procedure, or requiring court-ordered transportation. Persons found to be pregnant and desiring abortions shall be permitted to determine their eligibility for an abortion pursuant to state
 and federal law, and if determined to be eligible, shall be permitted to obtain an abortion, after providing informed consent.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “local detention facility” means any city, county, or regional facility used for the confinement for more than 24 hours of a person capable of becoming pregnant.

(c) The rights provided by this section shall be posted in at least one conspicuous place to which all incarcerated persons capable of becoming pregnant have access.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 136, Sec. 23.   (AB 260)   Effective September 26, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4029.

(a) Whenever within any county adult detention facility or part of any county detention facility used for the confinement of adults, not including any city jail, any facility, including but not limited to any room or cell, vocational training facility, recreation area, rest area, dining room, store, or facility for the exercise of religious freedom, is provided for use by any prisoner for any purpose, a separate facility of equal quality, or separate use of the same facility, or joint use of the same facility where appropriate, shall be provided for prisoners of the opposite sex for such purpose.

(b) Whenever within any county adult detention facility or part of any county detention facility used for the confinement of adults, not including any city jail, any program, service or privilege, including but not limited to any general or vocational education, physical education or recreation, work furlough program, psychological counseling, work within the institution, visiting privileges, or medical treatment, is provided for any prisoner, such a program, service or privilege of equal quality shall be provided for prisoners of the opposite sex, except when the proportion of prisoners of one sex is so small that the cost of providing any program, service or privilege described in this subdivision, other than medical treatment or health maintenance, for such prisoners would not be justified in relation to the reduction in the level of any other program, service or privilege that would result from the diversion of funds for such purpose.

(c) Nothing in this section shall require the establishment of any facility for the use of, or the making available of any program, service or privilege to, any prisoner. Nothing in this section shall require any facility, program, service or privilege established or available prior or subsequent to January 1, 1975, to be made available to any particular male or female prisoner or number of such prisoners, except that any type of facility, program, service or privilege which is made accessible or available to all male or female prisoners in any class defined by subdivisions 1, 2, and 3 of Section 4001 shall be made accessible or available to all prisoners of the opposite sex in such class as provided in subdivisions (a) and (b), and any criterion other than the sex of the prisoner which is used for the selection of a particular prisoner or group of prisoners to have, or to have access to, any facility, program, service or privilege shall be equally applied to the selection of all prisoners, regardless of sex.

(d) Every county shall comply with subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) by January 1, 1979. Such compliance shall not be required unless the Legislature provides funds to assist in the accomplishment of such compliance. Every county shall report to the Legislature by January 1, 1976, as to whether such compliance can be accomplished, and stating the reasons why it cannot be accomplished if that be the case.

(e) Whenever within any county adult detention facility or part of any county detention facility used for the confinement of adults, not including any city jail, an inpatient psychiatric facility designated by the county mental health director to treat patients under Division 5 (commencing with Section 5000) and Division 6 (commencing with Section 6000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code, is provided for prisoners of one sex who may not depart from the detention facility for treatment elsewhere, and where the proportion of prisoners of the opposite sex requiring the same type of treatment is so small that the cost of providing a separate program of equal quality would not be justified in relation to the reduction in the level of another program, service, or privilege that would result from the diversion of funds for such purpose, the above designated mental health treatment program may treat prisoners of both sexes if each of the following conditions is met:

(1) The program is one that would be considered suitable for the treatment of patients of both sexes if it were located in a psychiatric treatment facility devoted to evaluation and treatment under Division 5 (commencing with Section 5000) and Division 6 (commencing with Section 6000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code for patients who are not prisoners.

(2) A female deputy sheriff or other suitable woman assigned to jail duty is assigned to the treatment program in accordance with Sections 4020.4, 4020.7, 4020.8, and 4021 of this code. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 4020.4 of this code, in a county of any size, the sheriff may designate a female member of the mental health treatment staff for this assignment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 547, Sec. 17.5.)
-------------------------------------------

4030.

(a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares that law enforcement policies and practices for conducting strip or body cavity searches of detained persons vary widely throughout California. Consequently, some people have been arbitrarily subjected to unnecessary strip and body cavity searches after arrests for minor misdemeanor and infraction offenses. Some present search practices violate state and federal constitutional rights to privacy and freedom from unreasonable searches and seizures.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to protect the state and federal constitutional rights of the people of California by establishing a statewide policy
 strictly limiting strip and body cavity searches.

(b) The provisions of this section shall apply only to prearraignment detainees arrested for infraction or misdemeanor offenses and to any minor detained prior to a detention hearing on the grounds that he or she is a person described in Section 300, 601, or 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code alleged to have committed a misdemeanor or infraction offense. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a person in the custody of the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or the Director of the Division of Juvenile Justice in the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(c) As used in this section the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Body cavity” only means the stomach or rectal cavity of a person, and vagina of a female person.

(2) “Physical body cavity search” means physical intrusion into a body cavity for the purpose of discovering any object concealed in the body cavity.

(3) “Strip search” means a search which requires a person to remove or arrange some or all of his or her clothing so as to permit a visual inspection of the underclothing, breasts, buttocks, or genitalia of such person.

(4) “Visual body cavity search” means visual inspection of a body cavity.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding
 any other law, including Section 40304.5 of the Vehicle Code, if a person is arrested and taken into custody, that person may be subjected to patdown searches, metal detector searches, body scanners, and thorough clothing searches in order to discover and retrieve concealed weapons and contraband substances prior to being placed in a booking cell.

(2) An agency that utilizes a body scanner pursuant to this subdivision shall endeavor to avoid knowingly using a body scanner to scan a woman who is pregnant.

(e) A person arrested and held in custody on a misdemeanor or infraction offense, except those involving weapons, controlled substances, or violence, or a minor detained prior to a detention hearing on
 the grounds that he or she is a person described in Section 300,
 601, or 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, except for those minors alleged to have committed felonies or offenses involving weapons, controlled substances, or violence, shall not be subjected to a strip search or visual body cavity search prior to placement in the general jail population, unless a peace officer has determined there is reasonable suspicion, based on specific and articulable facts, to believe that person is concealing a weapon or contraband, and a strip search will result in the discovery of the weapon or contraband. A strip search or visual body cavity search, or both, shall not be conducted without the prior written authorization of the supervising officer on duty. The authorization shall include the specific and articulable facts and circumstances upon which the reasonable suspicion determination was made by the supervisor.

(f) (1) Except pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (2), a person arrested and held in custody on a misdemeanor or infraction offense not involving weapons, controlled substances, or violence, shall not be confined in the general jail population unless all of the following are true:

(A) The person is not cited and released.

(B) The person is not released on his or her own recognizance pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 1318) of Chapter 1 of Title 10 of Part 2.

(C) The person is not able to post bail within a reasonable time, not less than three hours.

(2) A
 person shall not be housed in the general jail population prior to release pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (1) unless a documented emergency exists and there is no reasonable alternative to that placement. The person shall be placed in the general population only upon prior written authorization documenting the specific facts and circumstances of the emergency. The written authorization shall be signed by the uniformed supervisor of the facility or by a uniformed watch commander. A person confined in the general jail population pursuant to paragraph (1) shall retain all rights to release on citation, his or her own
 recognizance, or bail that were preempted as a consequence of the emergency.

(g) A person arrested on a misdemeanor or infraction offense, or a minor described in subdivision (b), shall not be subjected to a physical body cavity search except under the authority of a search warrant issued by a magistrate specifically authorizing the physical body cavity search.

(h) A copy of the prior written authorization required by subdivisions (e) and (f) and the search warrant required by subdivision (g) shall be placed in the agency’s records and made available, on request, to the person searched or his or her authorized representative. With regard to a strip search or visual or physical body cavity search, the time, date, and place of the search, the name and sex of the
 person conducting the search, and a statement of the results of the search, including a list of items removed from the person searched, shall be recorded in the agency’s records and made available, upon request, to the person searched or his or her authorized representative.

(i) Persons conducting a strip search or a visual body cavity search shall not touch the breasts, buttocks, or genitalia of the person being searched.

(j) A physical body cavity search shall be conducted under sanitary conditions, and only by a physician, nurse practitioner, registered nurse, licensed vocational nurse, or emergency medical technician Level II licensed to practice in this state. A physician engaged in providing health care to detainees and inmates of the facility may conduct physical body
 cavity searches.

(k) (1) A person conducting or otherwise present or within sight of the inmate during a strip search or visual or physical body cavity search shall be of the same sex as the person being searched, except for physicians or licensed medical personnel.

(2) A person within sight of the visual display of a body scanner depicting the body during a scan shall be of the same sex as the person being scanned, except for physicians or licensed medical personnel.

(l) All strip, visual, and physical body cavity searches shall be conducted
 in an area of privacy so that the search cannot be observed by persons not participating in the search. Persons are considered to be participating in the search if their official duties relative to search procedure require them to be present at the time the search is conducted.

(m) A person who knowingly and willfully authorizes or conducts a strip search or visual or physical body cavity search in violation of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(n) This
 section does not limit the common law or statutory rights of a person regarding an action for damages or injunctive relief, or preclude the prosecution under another law of a peace officer or other person who has violated this section.

(o) Any person who suffers damage or harm as a result of a violation of this section may bring a civil action to recover actual damages, or one thousand dollars ($1,000), whichever is greater. In addition, the court may, in its discretion, award punitive damages, equitable relief as it deems necessary and proper, and costs, including reasonable attorney’s fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 162, Sec. 1.   (AB 1705)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4031.

(a) This section applies to all minors detained in a juvenile detention center on the grounds that he or she is a person described in Section 300, 601, or 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and all minors adjudged a ward of the court and held in a juvenile detention center on the grounds he or she is a person described in Section 300, 601, or 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) Persons conducting a strip search or a visual body cavity search shall not touch the breasts, buttocks, or genitalia of the person being searched.

(c) A physical body cavity search shall be conducted under sanitary conditions, and only by a physician, nurse practitioner, registered nurse, licensed vocational
 nurse, or emergency medical technician Level II licensed to practice in this state. A physician engaged in providing health care to detainees, wards, and inmates of the facility may conduct physical body cavity searches.

(d) A person conducting or otherwise present or within sight of the inmate during a strip search or visual or physical body cavity search shall be of the same sex as the person being searched, except for physicians or licensed medical personnel.

(e) All strip searches and visual and physical body cavity searches shall be conducted in an area of privacy so that the search cannot be observed by persons not participating in the search. Persons are considered to be participating in the search if their official duties relative to search procedure require them to be present at the time the search is conducted.

(f) A person who knowingly and willfully authorizes or conducts a strip search and visual or physical body cavity search in violation of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(g) This section shall not be construed as limiting the common law or statutory rights of a person regarding an action for damages or injunctive relief, or as precluding the prosecution under another law of a peace officer or other person who has violated this section.

(h) Any person who suffers damage or harm as a result of a violation of this section may bring a civil action to recover actual damages, or one thousand dollars ($1,000), whichever is greater. In addition, the court may, in its discretion, award punitive damages, equitable relief as it deems necessary and proper, and costs, including reasonable attorney’s fees.

(i) This section does not limit the protections granted by Section 4030 to individuals described in subdivision (b) of that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 240.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4032.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:
